Connecticut, session 2026, HB05444.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 12-700 of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (a) There is hereby imposed on the Connecticut taxable income of
5 each resident of this state a tax:
6 (1) At the rate of four and one-half per cent of such Connecticut
7 taxable income for taxable years commencing on or after January 1,
8 1992, and prior to January 1, 1996.
9 (2) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 1996, but
10 prior to January 1, 1997, in accordance with the following schedule:
11 (A) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
12 for such taxable year as an unmarried individual or as a married
13 individual filing separately:
T1
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T2
Not over $2,250 3.0%
LCO 1 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
T3
Over $2,250 $67.50, plus 4.5% of the
T4
excess over $2,250
14 (B) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax for
15 such taxable year as a head of household, as defined in Section 2(b) of
16 the Internal Revenue Code:
T5 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T6
Not over $3,500 3.0%
T7
Over $3,500 $105.00, plus 4.5% of the
T8
excess over $3,500
17 (C) For any husband and wife who file a return under the federal
18 income tax for such taxable year as married individuals filing jointly or
19 a person who files a return under the federal income tax as a surviving
20 spouse, as defined in Section 2(a) of the Internal Revenue Code:
T9 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T10 Not over $4,500 3.0%
T11 Over $4,500 $135.00, plus 4.5% of the
T12 excess over $4,500
21 (D) For trusts or estates, the rate of tax shall be 4.5% of their
22 Connecticut taxable income.
23 (3) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 1997, but
24 prior to January 1, 1998, in accordance with the following schedule:
25 (A) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
26 for such taxable year as an unmarried individual or as a married
27 individual filing separately:
T13
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T14 Not over $6,250 3.0%
T15 Over $6,250 $187.50, plus 4.5% of the
T16 excess over $6,250
LCO 2 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
28 (B) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax for
29 such taxable year as a head of household, as defined in Section 2(b) of
30 the Internal Revenue Code:
T17
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T18 Not over $10,000 3.0%
T19 Over $10,000 $300.00, plus 4.5% of the
T20 excess over $10,000
31 (C) For any husband and wife who file a return under the federal
32 income tax for such taxable year as married individuals filing jointly or
33 any person who files a return under the federal income tax for such
34 taxable year as a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 2(a) of the
35 Internal Revenue Code:
T21 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T22
Not over $12,500 3.0%
T23
Over $12,500 $375.00, plus 4.5% of the
T24
excess over $12,500
36 (D) For trusts or estates, the rate of tax shall be 4.5% of their
37 Connecticut taxable income.
38 (4) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 1998, but
39 prior to January 1, 1999, in accordance with the following schedule:
40 (A) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
41 for such taxable year as an unmarried individual or as a married
42 individual filing separately:
T25 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T26
Not over $7,500 3.0%
T27
Over $7,500 $225.00, plus 4.5% of the
T28
excess over $7,500
LCO 3 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
43 (B) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax for
44 such taxable year as a head of household, as defined in Section 2(b) of
45 the Internal Revenue Code:
T29 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T30
Not over $12,000 3.0%
T31
Over $12,000 $360.00, plus 4.5% of the
T32
excess over $12,000
46 (C) For any husband and wife who file a return under the federal
47 income tax for such taxable year as married individuals filing jointly or
48 any person who files a return under the federal income tax for such
49 taxable year as a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 2(a) of the
50 Internal Revenue Code:
T33
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T34
Not over $15,000 3.0%
T35
Over $15,000 $450.00, plus 4.5% of the
T36
excess over $15,000
51 (D) For trusts or estates, the rate of tax shall be 4.5% of their
52 Connecticut taxable income.
53 (5) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 1999, but
54 prior to January 1, 2003, in accordance with the following schedule:
55 (A) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
56 for such taxable year as an unmarried individual or as a married
57 individual filing separately:
T37 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T38
Not over $10,000 3.0%
T39
Over $10,000 $300.00, plus 4.5% of the
T40
excess over $10,000
58 (B) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax for
LCO 4 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
59 such taxable year as a head of household, as defined in Section 2(b) of
60 the Internal Revenue Code:
T41 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T42
Not over $16,000 3.0%
T43
Over $16,000 $480.00, plus 4.5% of the
T44
excess over $16,000
61 (C) For any husband and wife who file a return under the federal
62 income tax for such taxable year as married individuals filing jointly or
63 any person who files a return under the federal income tax for such
64 taxable year as a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 2(a) of the
65 Internal Revenue Code:
T45
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T46
Not over $20,000 3.0%
T47
Over $20,000 $600.00, plus 4.5% of the
T48
excess over $20,000
66 (D) For trusts or estates, the rate of tax shall be 4.5% of their
67 Connecticut taxable income.
68 (6) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2003, but
69 prior to January 1, 2009, in accordance with the following schedule:
70 (A) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
71 for such taxable year as an unmarried individual or as a married
72 individual filing separately:
T49 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T50
Not over $10,000 3.0%
T51
Over $10,000 $300.00, plus 5.0% of the
T52
excess over $10,000
73 (B) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax for
74 such taxable year as a head of household, as defined in Section 2(b) of
LCO 5 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
75 the Internal Revenue Code:
T53 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T54
Not over $16,000 3.0%
T55
Over $16,000 $480.00, plus 5.0% of the
T56
excess over $16,000
76 (C) For any husband and wife who file a return under the federal
77 income tax for such taxable year as married individuals filing jointly or
78 any person who files a return under the federal income tax for such
79 taxable year as a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 2(a) of the
80 Internal Revenue Code:
T57 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T58
Not over $20,000 3.0%
T59
Over $20,000 $600.00, plus 5.0% of the
T60
excess over $20,000
81 (D) For trusts or estates, the rate of tax shall be 5.0% of the
82 Connecticut taxable income.
83 (7) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2009, but
84 prior to January 1, 2011, in accordance with the following schedule:
85 (A) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
86 for such taxable year as an unmarried individual:
T61
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T62
Not over $10,000 3.0%
T63
Over $10,000 but not $300.00, plus 5.0% of the
T64
over $500,000 excess over $10,000
T65
Over $500,000 $24,800, plus 6.5% of the
T66
excess over $500,000
87 (B) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax for
88 such taxable year as a head of household, as defined in Section 2(b) of
LCO 6 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
89 the Internal Revenue Code:
T67 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T68
Not over $16,000 3.0%
T69
Over $16,000 but not $480.00, plus 5.0% of the
T70
over $800,000 excess over $16,000
T71
Over $800,000 $39,680, plus 6.5% of the
T72 excess over $800,000
90 (C) For any husband and wife who file a return under the federal
91 income tax for such taxable year as married individuals filing jointly or
92 any person who files a return under the federal income tax for such
93 taxable year as a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 2(a) of the
94 Internal Revenue Code:
T73
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T74
Not over $20,000 3.0%
T75
Over $20,000 but not $600.00, plus 5.0% of the
T76
over $1,000,000 excess over $20,000
T77
Over $1,000,000 $49,600, plus 6.5% of the
T78
excess over $1,000,000
95 (D) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
96 for such taxable year as a married individual filing separately:
T79
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T80
Not over $10,000 3.0%
T81
Over $10,000 but not $300.00, plus 5.0% of the
T82
over $500,000 excess over $10,000
T83
Over $500,000 $24,800, plus 6.5% of the
T84
excess over $500,000
97 (E) For trusts or estates, the rate of tax shall be 6.5% of the Connecticut
98 taxable income.
99 (8) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2011, but
LCO 7 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
100 prior to January 1, 2015, in accordance with the following schedule:
101 (A) (i) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
102 for such taxable year as an unmarried individual:
T85 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T86
Not over $10,000 3.0%
T87
Over $10,000 but not $300.00, plus 5.0% of the
T88
over $50,000 excess over $10,000
T89
Over $50,000 but not $2,300, plus 5.5% of the
T90
over $100,000 excess over $50,000
T91
Over $100,000 but not $5,050, plus 6.0% of the
T92
over $200,000 excess over $100,000
T93
Over $200,000 but not $11,050, plus 6.5% of the
T94
over $250,000 excess over $200,000
T95
Over $250,000 $14,300, plus 6.70% of the
T96
excess over $250,000
103 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A)(i) of this
104 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
105 income exceeds fifty-six thousand five hundred dollars, the amount of
106 the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the three-per-cent
107 tax rate applies shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each five
108 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
109 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount. Any such
110 amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided in the
111 preceding sentence, the three-per-cent tax rate does not apply shall be
112 an amount to which the five-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
113 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
114 two hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
115 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (A)(i) and (A)(ii) of
116 this subdivision, an amount equal to seventy-five dollars for each five
117 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
118 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds two hundred thousand
119 dollars, up to a maximum payment of two thousand two hundred fifty
LCO 8 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
120 dollars.
121 (B) (i) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
122 for such taxable year as a head of household, as defined in Section 2(b)
123 of the Internal Revenue Code:
T97
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T98
Not over $16,000 3.0%
T99
Over $16,000 but not $480.00, plus 5.0% of the
T100
over $80,000 excess over $16,000
T101
Over $80,000 but not $3,680, plus 5.5% of the
T102
over $160,000 excess over $80,000
T103
Over $160,000 but not $8,080, plus 6.0% of the
T104
over $320,000 excess over $160,000
T105
Over $320,000 but not $17,680, plus 6.5% of the
T106
over $400,000 excess over $320,000
T107
Over $400,000 $22,880, plus 6.70% of the
T108
excess over $400,000
124 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (B)(i) of this
125 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
126 income exceeds seventy-eight thousand five hundred dollars, the
127 amount of the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the three-
128 per-cent tax rate applies shall be reduced by one thousand six hundred
129 dollars for each four thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
130 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount.
131 Any such amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided
132 in the preceding sentence, the three-per-cent tax rate does not apply
133 shall be an amount to which the five-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
134 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
135 three hundred twenty thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
136 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (B)(i) and (B)(ii) of
137 this subdivision, an amount equal to one hundred twenty dollars for
138 each eight thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
139 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds three hundred twenty
LCO 9 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
140 thousand dollars, up to a maximum payment of three thousand six
141 hundred dollars.
142 (C) (i) For any husband and wife who file a return under the federal
143 income tax for such taxable year as married individuals filing jointly or
144 any person who files a return under the federal income tax for such
145 taxable year as a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 2(a) of the
146 Internal Revenue Code:
T109 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T110
Not over $20,000 3.0%
T111
Over $20,000 but not $600.00, plus 5.0% of the
T112
over $100,000 excess over $20,000
T113
Over $100,000 but not $4,600, plus 5.5% of the
T114
over $200,000 excess over $100,000
T115
Over $200,000 but not $10,100, plus 6.0% of the
T116
over $400,000 excess over $200,000
T117
Over $400,000 but not $22,100, plus 6.5% of the
T118
over $500,000 excess over $400,000
T119
Over $500,000 $28,600, plus 6.70% of the
T120
excess over $500,000
147 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (C)(i) of this
148 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
149 income exceeds one hundred thousand five hundred dollars, the
150 amount of the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the three-
151 per-cent tax rate applies shall be reduced by two thousand dollars for
152 each five thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
153 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount. Any such
154 amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided in the
155 preceding sentence, the three-per-cent tax rate does not apply shall be
156 an amount to which the five-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
157 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
158 four hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
LCO 10 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
159 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (C)(i) and (C)(ii) of
160 this subdivision, an amount equal to one hundred fifty dollars for each
161 ten thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
162 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds four hundred thousand
163 dollars, up to a maximum payment of four thousand five hundred
164 dollars.
165 (D) (i) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
166 for such taxable year as a married individual filing separately:
T121 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T122
Not over $10,000 3.0%
T123
Over $10,000 but not $300.00, plus 5.0% of the
T124
over $50,000 excess over $10,000
T125
Over $50,000 but not $2,300, plus 5.5% of the
T126
over $100,000 excess over $50,000
T127
Over $100,000 but not $5,050, plus 6.0% of the
T128
over $200,000 excess over $100,000
T129
Over $200,000 but not $11,050, plus 6.5% of the
T130
over $250,000 excess over $200,000
T131
Over $250,000 $14,300, plus 6.70% of the
T132
excess over $250,000
167 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (D)(i) of this
168 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
169 income exceeds fifty thousand two hundred fifty dollars, the amount of
170 the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the three-per-cent
171 tax rate applies shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each two
172 thousand five hundred dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
173 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount.
174 Any such amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided
175 in the preceding sentence, the three-per-cent tax rate does not apply
176 shall be an amount to which the five-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
177 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
LCO 11 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
178 two hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
179 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (D)(i) and (D)(ii) of
180 this subdivision, an amount equal to seventy-five dollars for each five
181 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
182 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds two hundred thousand
183 dollars, up to a maximum payment of two thousand two hundred fifty
184 dollars.
185 (E) For trusts or estates, the rate of tax shall be 6.70% of the
186 Connecticut taxable income.
187 (9) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2015, but
188 prior to January 1, 2024, in accordance with the following schedule:
189 (A) (i) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
190 for such taxable year as an unmarried individual:
T133
Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T134
Not over $10,000 3.0%
T135
Over $10,000 but not $300.00, plus 5.0% of the
T136
over $50,000 excess over $10,000
T137
Over $50,000 but not $2,300, plus 5.5% of the
T138
over $100,000 excess over $50,000
T139
Over $100,000 but not $5,050, plus 6.0% of the
T140
over $200,000 excess over $100,000
T141
Over $200,000 but not $11,050, plus 6.5% of the
T142
over $250,000 excess over $200,000
T143
Over $250,000 but not $14,300, plus 6.9% of the
T144
over $500,000 excess over $250,000
T145
Over $500,000 $31,550, plus 6.99% of the
T146
excess over $500,000
191 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A)(i) of this
192 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
193 income exceeds fifty-six thousand five hundred dollars, the amount of
194 the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the three-per-cent
LCO 12 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
195 tax rate applies shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each five
196 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
197 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount. Any such
198 amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided in the
199 preceding sentence, the three-per-cent tax rate does not apply shall be
200 an amount to which the five-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
201 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
202 two hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
203 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (A)(i) and (A)(ii) of
204 this subdivision, an amount equal to ninety dollars for each five
205 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
206 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds two hundred thousand
207 dollars, up to a maximum payment of two thousand seven hundred
208 dollars.
209 (iv) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
210 five hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
211 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (A)(i), (A)(ii) and
212 (A)(iii) of this subdivision, an amount equal to fifty dollars for each five
213 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
214 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds five hundred thousand
215 dollars, up to a maximum payment of four hundred fifty dollars.
216 (B) (i) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
217 for such taxable year as a head of household, as defined in Section 2(b)
218 of the Internal Revenue Code:
T147 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T148
Not over $16,000 3.0%
T149
Over $16,000 but not $480.00, plus 5.0% of the
T150
over $80,000 excess over $16,000
T151
Over $80,000 but not $3,680, plus 5.5% of the
T152
over $160,000 excess over $80,000
T153
Over $160,000 but not $8,080, plus 6.0% of the
T154
over $320,000 excess over $160,000
LCO 13 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
T155
Over $320,000 but not $17,680, plus 6.5% of the
T156
over $400,000 excess over $320,000
T157
Over $400,000 but not $22,880, plus 6.9% of the
T158
over $800,000 excess over $400,000
T159
Over $800,000 $50,480, plus 6.99% of the
T160
excess over $800,000
219 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (B)(i) of this
220 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
221 income exceeds seventy-eight thousand five hundred dollars, the
222 amount of the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the three-
223 per-cent tax rate applies shall be reduced by one thousand six hundred
224 dollars for each four thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
225 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount.
226 Any such amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided
227 in the preceding sentence, the three-per-cent tax rate does not apply
228 shall be an amount to which the five-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
229 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
230 three hundred twenty thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
231 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (B)(i) and (B)(ii) of
232 this subdivision, an amount equal to one hundred forty dollars for each
233 eight thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
234 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds three hundred twenty
235 thousand dollars, up to a maximum payment of four thousand two
236 hundred dollars.
237 (iv) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
238 eight hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
239 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (B)(i), (B)(ii) and
240 (B)(iii) of this subdivision, an amount equal to eighty dollars for each
241 eight thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
242 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds eight hundred thousand
243 dollars, up to a maximum payment of seven hundred twenty dollars.
244 (C) (i) For any husband and wife who file a return under the federal
LCO 14 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
245 income tax for such taxable year as married individuals filing jointly or
246 any person who files a return under the federal income tax for such
247 taxable year as a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 2(a) of the
248 Internal Revenue Code:
T161 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T162
Not over $20,000 3.0%
T163 Over $20,000 but not $600.00, plus 5.0% of the
T164 over $100,000 excess over $20,000
T165
Over $100,000 but not $4,600, plus 5.5% of the
T166
over $200,000 excess over $100,000
T167 Over $200,000 but not $10,100, plus 6.0% of the
T168 over $400,000 excess over $200,000
T169
Over $400,000 but not $22,100, plus 6.5% of the
T170
over $500,000 excess over $400,000
T171 Over $500,000 but not $28,600, plus 6.9% of the
T172 over $1,000,000 excess over $500,000
T173
Over $1,000,000 $63,100, plus 6.99% of the
T174
excess over $1,000,000
249 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (C)(i) of this
250 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
251 income exceeds one hundred thousand five hundred dollars, the
252 amount of the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the three-
253 per-cent tax rate applies shall be reduced by two thousand dollars for
254 each five thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
255 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount. Any such
256 amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided in the
257 preceding sentence, the three-per-cent tax rate does not apply shall be
258 an amount to which the five-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
259 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
260 four hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
261 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (C)(i) and (C)(ii) of
262 this subdivision, an amount equal to one hundred eighty dollars for
LCO 15 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
263 each ten thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
264 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds four hundred thousand
265 dollars, up to a maximum payment of five thousand four hundred
266 dollars.
267 (iv) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
268 one million dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax computed under the
269 provisions of subparagraphs (C)(i), (C)(ii) and (C)(iii) of this
270 subdivision, an amount equal to one hundred dollars for each ten
271 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
272 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds one million dollars, up to a
273 maximum payment of nine hundred dollars.
274 (D) (i) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
275 for such taxable year as a married individual filing separately:
T175 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T176 Not over $10,000 3.0%
T177 Over $10,000 but not $300.00, plus 5.0% of the
T178
over $50,000 excess over $10,000
T179
Over $50,000 but not $2,300, plus 5.5% of the
T180 over $100,000 excess over $50,000
T181 Over $100,000 but not $5,050, plus 6.0% of the
T182
over $200,000 excess over $100,000
T183
Over $200,000 but not $11,050, plus 6.5% of the
T184 over $250,000 excess over $200,000
T185 Over $250,000 but not $14,300, plus 6.9% of the
T186
over $500,000 excess over $250,000
T187
Over $500,000 $31,550, plus 6.99% of the
T188 excess over $500,000
276 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (D)(i) of this
277 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
278 income exceeds fifty thousand two hundred fifty dollars, the amount of
279 the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the three-per-cent
LCO 16 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
280 tax rate applies shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each two
281 thousand five hundred dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
282 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount.
283 Any such amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided
284 in the preceding sentence, the three-per-cent tax rate does not apply
285 shall be an amount to which the five-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
286 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
287 two hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
288 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (D)(i) and (D)(ii) of
289 this subdivision, an amount equal to ninety dollars for each five
290 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
291 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds two hundred thousand
292 dollars, up to a maximum payment of two thousand seven hundred
293 dollars.
294 (iv) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
295 five hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
296 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (D)(i), (D)(ii) and
297 (D)(iii) of this subdivision, an amount equal to fifty dollars for each five
298 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
299 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds five hundred thousand
300 dollars, up to a maximum payment of four hundred fifty dollars.
301 (E) For trusts or estates, the rate of tax shall be 6.99% of the
302 Connecticut taxable income.
303 (10) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2024, in
304 accordance with the following schedule and, for taxable years
305 commencing on or after January 1, 2028, subject to the provisions of
306 subdivision (11) of this subsection:
307 (A) (i) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
308 for such taxable year as an unmarried individual:
T189 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
LCO 17 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
T190
Not over $10,000 2.0%
T191
Over $10,000 but not $200.00, plus 4.5% of the
T192
over $50,000 excess over $10,000
T193
Over $50,000 but not $2,000, plus 5.5% of the
T194
over $100,000 excess over $50,000
T195
Over $100,000 but not $4,750, plus 6.0% of the
T196
over $200,000 excess over $100,000
T197
Over $200,000 but not $10,750, plus 6.5% of the
T198
over $250,000 excess over $200,000
T199
Over $250,000 but not $14,000, plus 6.9% of the
T200
over $500,000 excess over $250,000
T201
Over $500,000 $31,250, plus 6.99% of the
T202
excess over $500,000
309 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A)(i) of this
310 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
311 income exceeds fifty-six thousand five hundred dollars, the amount of
312 the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the two-per-cent tax
313 rate applies shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each five
314 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
315 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount. Any such
316 amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided in the
317 preceding sentence, the two-per-cent tax rate does not apply shall be an
318 amount to which the four-and-one-half-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
319 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
320 one hundred five thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
321 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (A)(i) and (A)(ii) of
322 this subdivision, an amount equal to twenty-five dollars for each five
323 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
324 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds one hundred five thousand
325 dollars, up to a maximum payment of two hundred fifty dollars.
326 (iv) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
327 two hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
328 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (A)(i), (A)(ii) and
LCO 18 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
329 (A)(iii) of this subdivision, an amount equal to ninety dollars for each
330 five thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
331 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds two hundred thousand
332 dollars, up to a maximum payment of two thousand seven hundred
333 dollars.
334 (v) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
335 five hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
336 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (A)(i), (A)(ii), (A)(iii)
337 and (A)(iv) of this subdivision, an amount equal to fifty dollars for each
338 five thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
339 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds five hundred thousand
340 dollars, up to a maximum payment of four hundred fifty dollars.
341 (B) (i) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
342 for such taxable year as a head of household, as defined in Section 2(b)
343 of the Internal Revenue Code:
T203 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T204
Not over $16,000 2.0%
T205
Over $16,000 but not $320.00, plus 4.5% of the
T206
over $80,000 excess over $16,000
T207
Over $80,000 but not $3,200, plus 5.5% of the
T208
over $160,000 excess over $80,000
T209
Over $160,000 but not $7,600, plus 6.0% of the
T210
over $320,000 excess over $160,000
T211
Over $320,000 but not $17,200, plus 6.5% of the
T212
over $400,000 excess over $320,000
T213
Over $400,000 but not $22,400, plus 6.9% of the
T214
over $800,000 excess over $400,000
T215
Over $800,000 $50,000, plus 6.99% of the
T216
excess over $800,000
344 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (B)(i) of this
345 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
346 income exceeds seventy-eight thousand five hundred dollars, the
LCO 19 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
347 amount of the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the two-
348 per-cent tax rate applies shall be reduced by one thousand six hundred
349 dollars for each four thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
350 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount.
351 Any such amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided
352 in the preceding sentence, the two-per-cent tax rate does not apply shall
353 be an amount to which the four-and-one-half-per-cent tax rate shall
354 apply.
355 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
356 one hundred sixty-eight thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the
357 tax computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (B)(i) and (B)(ii) of
358 this subdivision, an amount equal to forty dollars for each eight
359 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
360 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds one hundred sixty-eight
361 thousand dollars, up to a maximum payment of four hundred dollars.
362 (iv) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
363 three hundred twenty thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
364 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (B)(i), (B)(ii) and
365 (B)(iii) of this subdivision, an amount equal to one hundred forty dollars
366 for each eight thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
367 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds three hundred
368 twenty thousand dollars, up to a maximum payment of four thousand
369 two hundred dollars.
370 (v) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
371 eight hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
372 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (B)(i), (B)(ii), (B)(iii)
373 and (B)(iv) of this subdivision, an amount equal to eighty dollars for
374 each eight thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
375 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds eight hundred thousand
376 dollars, up to a maximum payment of seven hundred twenty dollars.
377 (C) (i) For any husband and wife who file a return under the federal
378 income tax for such taxable year as married individuals filing jointly or
LCO 20 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
379 any person who files a return under the federal income tax for such
380 taxable year as a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 2(a) of the
381 Internal Revenue Code:
T217 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T218
Not over $20,000 2.0%
T219 Over $20,000 but not $400.00, plus 4.5% of the
T220 over $100,000 excess over $20,000
T221
Over $100,000 but not $4,000, plus 5.5% of the
T222
over $200,000 excess over $100,000
T223 Over $200,000 but not $9,500, plus 6.0% of the
T224 over $400,000 excess over $200,000
T225
Over $400,000 but not $21,500, plus 6.5% of the
T226
over $500,000 excess over $400,000
T227 Over $500,000 but not $28,000, plus 6.9% of the
T228 over $1,000,000 excess over $500,000
T229
Over $1,000,000 $62,500, plus 6.99% of the
T230
excess over $1,000,000
382 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (C)(i) of this
383 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
384 income exceeds one hundred thousand five hundred dollars, the
385 amount of the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the two-
386 per-cent tax rate applies shall be reduced by two thousand dollars for
387 each five thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
388 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount. Any such
389 amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided in the
390 preceding sentence, the two-per-cent tax rate does not apply shall be an
391 amount to which the four-and-one-half-per-cent tax rate shall apply.
392 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
393 two hundred ten thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
394 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (C)(i) and (C)(ii) of
395 this subdivision, an amount equal to fifty dollars for each ten thousand
396 dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut
LCO 21 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
397 adjusted gross income exceeds two hundred ten thousand dollars, up to
398 a maximum payment of five hundred dollars.
399 (iv) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
400 four hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
401 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (C)(i), (C)(ii) and
402 (C)(iii) of this subdivision, an amount equal to one hundred eighty
403 dollars for each ten thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
404 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds four hundred
405 thousand dollars, up to a maximum payment of five thousand four
406 hundred dollars.
407 (v) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
408 one million dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax computed under the
409 provisions of subparagraphs (C)(i), (C)(ii), (C)(iii) and (C)(iv) of this
410 subdivision, an amount equal to one hundred dollars for each ten
411 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
412 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds one million dollars, up to a
413 maximum payment of nine hundred dollars.
414 (D) (i) For any person who files a return under the federal income tax
415 for such taxable year as a married individual filing separately:
T231 Connecticut Taxable Income Rate of Tax
T232
Not over $10,000 2.0%
T233 Over $10,000 but not $200.00, plus 4.5% of the
T234 over $50,000 excess over $10,000
T235
Over $50,000 but not $2,000, plus 5.5% of the
T236
over $100,000 excess over $50,000
T237 Over $100,000 but not $4,750, plus 6.0% of the
T238 over $200,000 excess over $100,000
T239
Over $200,000 but not $10,750, plus 6.5% of the
T240
over $250,000 excess over $200,000
T241 Over $250,000 but not $14,000, plus 6.9% of the
T242 over $500,000 excess over $250,000
LCO 22 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
T243 Over $500,000 $31,250, plus 6.99% of the
T244
excess over $500,000
416 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (D)(i) of this
417 subdivision, for each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
418 income exceeds fifty thousand two hundred fifty dollars, the amount of
419 the taxpayer's Connecticut taxable income to which the two-per-cent tax
420 rate applies shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each two
421 thousand five hundred dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
422 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds said amount.
423 Any such amount of Connecticut taxable income to which, as provided
424 in the preceding sentence, the two-per-cent tax rate does not apply shall
425 be an amount to which the four-and-one-half-per-cent tax rate shall
426 apply.
427 (iii) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
428 one hundred five thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
429 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (D)(i) and (D)(ii) of
430 this subdivision, an amount equal to twenty-five dollars for each five
431 thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
432 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds one hundred five thousand
433 dollars, up to a maximum payment of two hundred fifty dollars.
434 (iv) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
435 two hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
436 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (D)(i), (D)(ii) and
437 (D)(iii) of this subdivision, an amount equal to ninety dollars for each
438 five thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
439 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds two hundred thousand
440 dollars, up to a maximum payment of two thousand seven hundred
441 dollars.
442 (v) Each taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds
443 five hundred thousand dollars shall pay, in addition to the tax
444 computed under the provisions of subparagraphs (D)(i), (D)(ii), (D)(iii)
445 and (D)(iv) of this subdivision, an amount equal to fifty dollars for each
LCO 23 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
446 five thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
447 Connecticut adjusted gross income exceeds five hundred thousand
448 dollars, up to a maximum payment of four hundred fifty dollars.
449 (E) For trusts or estates, the rate of tax shall be 6.99% of the
450 Connecticut taxable income.
451 (11) (A) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2028, but
452 prior to January 1, 2029, the Connecticut taxable income brackets set
453 forth in subparagraphs (A)(i), (B)(i), (C)(i) and (D)(i) of subdivision (10)
454 of this subsection shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in
455 inflation and rounded to the nearest dollar.
456 (B) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2029, the
457 income brackets calculated for the preceding taxable year shall be
458 adjusted annually by the percentage increase in inflation and rounded
459 to the nearest dollar.
460 (C) As used in this subdivision, "increase in inflation" means the
461 increase in the chained consumer price index for all urban consumers
462 during the preceding year, calculated on an August over August basis,
463 using data reported by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
464 [(11)] (12) The provisions of this subsection shall apply to resident
465 trusts and estates and, wherever reference is made in this subsection to
466 residents of this state, such reference shall be construed to include
467 resident trusts and estates, provided any reference to a resident's
468 Connecticut adjusted gross income derived from sources without this
469 state or to a resident's Connecticut adjusted gross income shall be
470 construed, in the case of a resident trust or estate, to mean the resident
471 trust or estate's Connecticut taxable income derived from sources
472 without this state and the resident trust or estate's Connecticut taxable
473 income, respectively.
474 Sec. 2. Section 12-702 of the general statutes is repealed and the
475 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
LCO 24 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
476 (a) (1) (A) Any person, other than a trust or estate, subject to the tax
477 under this chapter for any taxable year who files under the federal
478 income tax for such taxable year as a married individual filing
479 separately or, for taxable years commencing prior to January 1, 2000,
480 who files income tax for such taxable year as an unmarried individual
481 shall be entitled to a personal exemption of twelve thousand dollars in
482 determining Connecticut taxable income for purposes of this chapter.
483 (B) In the case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
484 income for the taxable year exceeds twenty-four thousand dollars, the
485 exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each
486 one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
487 Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds said
488 amount. In no event shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of
489 the exemption.
490 (C) (i) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2028, but
491 prior to January 1, 2029, the personal exemption amount set forth in
492 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision and the Connecticut adjusted
493 gross income threshold set forth in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision
494 shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in inflation and rounded to
495 the nearest dollar. In the case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut
496 adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds the income threshold
497 as adjusted pursuant to this clause, the exemption amount shall be
498 reduced by one thousand dollars for each one thousand dollars, or
499 fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross
500 income for the taxable year exceeds such income threshold. In no event
501 shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of the exemption.
502 (ii) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2029, the
503 personal exemption amount and the income threshold calculated for the
504 preceding taxable year shall be adjusted annually by the percentage
505 increase in inflation and rounded to the nearest dollar. In the case of any
506 such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable
507 year exceeds the income threshold as adjusted pursuant to this clause,
508 the exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for
LCO 25 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
509 each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
510 Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds such
511 income threshold. In no event shall the reduction exceed one hundred
512 per cent of the exemption.
513 (2) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2000, any
514 person, other than a trust or estate, subject to the tax under this chapter
515 for any taxable year who files under the federal income tax for such
516 taxable year as an unmarried individual shall be entitled to a personal
517 exemption in determining Connecticut taxable income for purposes of
518 this chapter as follows:
519 (A) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2000, but
520 prior to January 1, 2001, twelve thousand two hundred fifty dollars. In
521 the case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income
522 for the taxable year exceeds twenty-four thousand five hundred dollars,
523 the exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for
524 each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
525 Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds said
526 amount. In no event shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of
527 the exemption;
528 (B) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2001, but
529 prior to January 1, 2004, twelve thousand five hundred dollars. In the
530 case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for
531 the taxable year exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars, the exemption
532 amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each one thousand
533 dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut
534 adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds said amount. In no
535 event shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of the exemption;
536 (C) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2004, but
537 prior to January 1, 2007, twelve thousand six hundred twenty-five
538 dollars. In the case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted
539 gross income for the taxable year exceeds twenty-five thousand two
540 hundred fifty dollars, the exemption amount shall be reduced by one
LCO 26 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
541 thousand dollars for each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by
542 which the taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable
543 year exceeds said amount. In no event shall the reduction exceed one
544 hundred per cent of the exemption;
545 (D) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2007, but
546 prior to January 1, 2008, twelve thousand seven hundred fifty dollars.
547 In the case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
548 income for the taxable year exceeds twenty-five thousand five hundred
549 dollars, the exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars
550 for each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
551 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year
552 exceeds said amount. In no event shall the reduction exceed one
553 hundred per cent of the exemption;
554 (E) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2008, but
555 prior to January 1, 2012, thirteen thousand dollars. In the case of any
556 such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable
557 year exceeds twenty-six thousand dollars, the exemption amount shall
558 be reduced by one thousand dollars for each one thousand dollars, or
559 fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross
560 income for the taxable year exceeds said amount. In no event shall the
561 reduction exceed one hundred per cent of the exemption;
562 (F) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2012, but
563 prior to January 1, 2013, thirteen thousand five hundred dollars. In the
564 case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for
565 the taxable year exceeds twenty-seven thousand dollars, the exemption
566 amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each one thousand
567 dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut
568 adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds said amount. In no
569 event shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of the exemption;
570 (G) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2013, but
571 prior to January 1, 2014, fourteen thousand dollars. In the case of any
572 such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable
LCO 27 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
573 year exceeds twenty-eight thousand dollars, the exemption amount
574 shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each one thousand dollars,
575 or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross
576 income for the taxable year exceeds said amount. In no event shall the
577 reduction exceed one hundred per cent of the exemption;
578 (H) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2014, but
579 prior to January 1, 2016, fourteen thousand five hundred dollars. In the
580 case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for
581 the taxable year exceeds twenty-nine thousand dollars, the exemption
582 amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each one thousand
583 dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut
584 adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds said amount. In no
585 event shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of the exemption;
586 (I) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2016, but prior
587 to January 1, 2028, fifteen thousand dollars. In the case of any such
588 taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year
589 exceeds thirty thousand dollars, the exemption amount shall be reduced
590 by one thousand dollars for each one thousand dollars, or fraction
591 thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income for
592 the taxable year exceeds said amount. In no event shall the reduction
593 exceed one hundred per cent of the exemption; [.]
594 (J) (i) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2028, but
595 prior to January 1, 2029, the personal exemption amount and the
596 Connecticut adjusted gross income threshold set forth in subparagraph
597 (I) of this subdivision shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in
598 inflation and rounded to the nearest dollar. In the case of any such
599 taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year
600 exceeds the income threshold as adjusted pursuant to this clause, the
601 exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each
602 one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
603 Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds such
604 income threshold. In no event shall the reduction exceed one hundred
605 per cent of the exemption;
LCO 28 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
606 (ii) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2029, the
607 personal exemption amount and the income threshold calculated for the
608 preceding taxable year shall be adjusted annually by the percentage
609 increase in inflation and rounded to the nearest dollar. In the case of any
610 such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable
611 year exceeds the income threshold as adjusted pursuant to this clause,
612 the exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for
613 each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
614 Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds such
615 income threshold. In no event shall the reduction exceed one hundred
616 per cent of the exemption.
617 (b) (1) Any person subject to tax under this chapter who files a return
618 under the federal income tax for such taxable year as a head of
619 household, as defined in Section 2(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall
620 be entitled to a personal exemption of nineteen thousand dollars in
621 determining Connecticut taxable income for purposes of this chapter.
622 (2) In the case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
623 income for the taxable year exceeds thirty-eight thousand dollars, the
624 exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each
625 one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
626 Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds the said
627 amount. In no event shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of
628 the exemption.
629 (3) (A) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2028, but
630 prior to January 1, 2029, the personal exemption amount set forth in
631 subdivision (1) of this subsection and the Connecticut adjusted gross
632 income threshold set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be
633 adjusted by the percentage increase in inflation and rounded to the
634 nearest dollar. In the case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut
635 adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds the income threshold
636 as adjusted pursuant to this subparagraph, the exemption amount shall
637 be reduced by one thousand dollars for each one thousand dollars, or
638 fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross
LCO 29 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
639 income for the taxable year exceeds such income threshold. In no event
640 shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of the exemption.
641 (B) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2029, the
642 personal exemption amount and the income threshold calculated for the
643 preceding taxable year shall be adjusted annually by the percentage
644 increase in inflation and rounded to the nearest dollar. In the case of any
645 such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable
646 year exceeds the income threshold as adjusted pursuant to this
647 subparagraph, the exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand
648 dollars for each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
649 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year
650 exceeds such income threshold. In no event shall the reduction exceed
651 one hundred per cent of the exemption.
652 (c) (1) Any husband and wife subject to tax under this chapter for any
653 taxable year who file a return under the federal income tax for such
654 taxable year as married individuals filing a joint return or any person
655 who files a return for such taxable year as a surviving spouse, as defined
656 in Section 2(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be entitled to a single
657 personal exemption of twenty-four thousand dollars in determining
658 Connecticut taxable income for purposes of this chapter. Any husband
659 and wife who elect to file a joint return under the federal income tax for
660 any taxable year shall be required to file jointly with respect to such
661 taxable year for purposes of this chapter, in which event their tax
662 liability under this chapter shall be joint and several, except as otherwise
663 provided in section 12-702a, and any husband and wife who elect to file
664 separately under the federal income tax for any taxable year shall be
665 required to file separately with respect to such taxable year for purposes
666 of this chapter, provided (A) if either the husband or wife is a resident
667 and the other is a nonresident, separate taxes shall be determined on
668 their separate Connecticut taxable incomes on separate forms as
669 married individuals filing separately unless such husband and wife
670 determine their federal taxable income jointly and both elect to
671 determine their joint Connecticut taxable income as if both were
672 residents, or (B) if any husband and wife, both of whom are
LCO 30 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
673 nonresidents, elect to file a joint return under the federal income tax for
674 any taxable year and only one of them has income derived from or
675 connected with sources within this state during such taxable year, only
676 the spouse with income derived from or connected with sources within
677 this state shall be required to file a return in this state and, if only the
678 spouse with income derived from or connected with this state files such
679 a return in this state, a separate tax shall be determined on such spouse's
680 separate Connecticut taxable income as a married individual filing
681 separately unless such husband and wife both elect to determine their
682 joint Connecticut taxable income as if both had income derived from or
683 connected with sources within this state.
684 (2) In the case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross
685 income for the taxable year exceeds forty-eight thousand dollars, the
686 exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand dollars for each
687 one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's
688 Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds the said
689 amount. In no event shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of
690 the exemption.
691 (3) (A) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2028, but
692 prior to January 1, 2029, the personal exemption amount set forth in
693 subdivision (1) of this subsection and the Connecticut adjusted gross
694 income threshold set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be
695 adjusted by the percentage increase in inflation and rounded to the
696 nearest dollar. In the case of any such taxpayer whose Connecticut
697 adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds the income threshold
698 as adjusted pursuant to this subparagraph, the exemption amount shall
699 be reduced by one thousand dollars for each one thousand dollars, or
700 fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross
701 income for the taxable year exceeds such income threshold. In no event
702 shall the reduction exceed one hundred per cent of the exemption.
703 (B) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2029, the
704 personal exemption amount and the income threshold calculated for the
705 preceding taxable year shall be adjusted annually by the percentage
LCO 31 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5444
706 increase in inflation and rounded to the nearest dollar. In the case of any
707 such taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable
708 year exceeds the income threshold as adjusted pursuant to this
709 subparagraph, the exemption amount shall be reduced by one thousand
710 dollars for each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
711 taxpayer's Connecticut adjusted gross income for the taxable year
712 exceeds such income threshold. In no event shall the reduction exceed
713 one hundred per cent of the exemption.
714 (d) As used in this section, "increase in inflation" has the same
715 meaning as provided in subdivision (11) of subsection (a) of section 12-
716 700, as amended by this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 12-700(a)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 12-702
FIN Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 32 of 32